North Carolina, session 2025, SB143.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1C reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1C. Disabled veteran property tax homestead exclusion.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The first forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000) of appraised value of the residence is excluded from taxation. A qualifying owner who
receives an exclusion under this section may not receive other property tax relief.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025.
*S143-v-1*